Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 330.99 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Oklahoma Task Force 1 (OK-TF1) shall be recognized as the
official deployment asset team for urban search and rescue missions
and for floods and disasters in this state; provided, however, OK-
TF1 shall not be deployed for wildland firefighting. OK-TF1 shall
be the first deployed asset for any Emergency Management Assistance
Compact-related requests outside of this state during any declared
disasters.
B. The Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management is
authorized to promulgate and enforce rules governing the

administration, allowable uses, and oversight of the Oklahoma Task
Force 1 Revolving Fund created in subsection C of this section. The
funds in the Oklahoma Task Force 1 Revolving Fund shall be divided
equally between the Oklahoma City and Tulsa teams of OK-TF1.
C. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management, to be
designated the “Oklahoma Task Force 1 Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies deposited to the credit of the fund
by law. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma
Department of Emergency Management for the direct reimbursement of
participating agencies of Oklahoma Task Force 1. Expenditures from
the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3831 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3831 Page 3